Massachusetts, session 194th, H2933.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 23 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting, in line 201, after the words “representative of a public safety
union” the following words:- from a list of 3 candidates nominated by the executive board of the
Massachusetts Association of Contributory Retirement Systems, Inc. who shall be a member of a
retirement system that has been vested in the PRIT Fund.
of 1